Ohio, session 136, HB584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3345.67 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3345.67. As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. For each intercollegiate athletic program, a state institution of higher education shall not, in any academic year, award students who are citizens of a foreign country more than twenty-five per cent of the program's scholarships, grants, or similar forms of financial assistance that are conditioned on student participation in an intercollegiate athletic program.